Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1715
Costs on motion; limit; how taxed.

Costs may be allowed on a motion, in the discretion of the court or judge, not exceeding ten dollars, which shall be absolute against the losing party on such motion, except that this provision shall not apply to verbal motions during the course of the trial.

Laws 1875, § 2, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 8174;

C.S.1922, § 9125;

C.S.1929, § 20-1715;

R.S.1943, § 25-1715;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 27.